Wyoming statutes. Title 19 Defense Forces and Affairs
Article 1. General Provisions

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

53 Am. Jur. 2d Military and Civil Defense § 1 et seq.

Admissibility and effect of evidence or comment on party's military service or lack thereof, 9 ALR2d 606.

Construction and application of 18 U.S.C. § 499 making it criminal offense to falsely make, forge, counterfeit, alter, tamper with or misuse naval, military or official passes or permits, 24 ALR Fed 189.

6 C.J.S. Armed Services § 1 et seq.; 57 C.J.S. Militia § 1 et seq.

§ 19-7-101.
Definitions.

As used in this act:

“Militia” means all the active and potential military forces of the state, whether organized or unorganized;

Whenever reference is made in the articles of the Uniform Code of Military Justice to “military service” or to the “armed forces” of the United States, the reference is deemed to include all “military service,” including “active state service” and the “organized militia” of this state;

“Wyoming national guard” means the army national guard and the air national guard;

“Military department” means the adjutant general, state military affairs and those divisions that may be authorized by federal or state authority;

“Active state service” means service on behalf of the state wherever called upon in aid of civil authorities, under martial law, at encampments ordered by state authority or upon any other duty requiring the entire time of the organization or person, including state active duty and duty under title 32, United States Code, except when called or ordered into the federal service of the United States under title 10, United States Code;

Repealed by Laws 2003, ch. 19, § 2.

“Officer” means commissioned officers and warrant officers;

“State active duty” means service on behalf of the state under the command of the governor excluding service while in status under title 32, United States Code, or while in federal service under title 10 of the United States Code;

“Enlisted member” means a member at military pay grades E-1 through E-9, as defined by federal rule and regulation;

“Membership” means an officer’s or enlisted member’s status when officially serving in the Wyoming national guard as a military member commencing with the date of initial appointment or enlistment, as applicable, extending through the date of discharge, and is not restricted or limited by service in any specified duty position;

“Discharge” or “separate” means to separate a member from the organization;

“This act” means title 19.

History.

Laws 1969, ch. 72, § 1; 1977, ch. 138, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

19-2-101

; Laws 1998, ch. 99, § 3; 1999, ch. 138, § 1; 2003, ch. 19, §§ 1, 2; ch. 88, § 1; 2017 ch. 45, § 1, effective February 17, 2017.

The 2017 amendment

, in (a)(iv), substituted “state military affairs and those divisions that may be authorized by federal or state authority” for “the divisions of the army national guard, the air national guard and state military affairs.”

Laws 2017, ch. 45, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by Art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved Feb. 17, 2017.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 19-7-102.
Creation and composition of military department.

The military department of the state of Wyoming shall consist of the adjutant general, state military affairs and those divisions that may be authorized by federal or state authority.

through (iii) Repealed by Laws 2017, ch. 45, § 2.

Repealed by Laws 2003, ch. 88, § 2.

History.

Laws 1998, ch. 99, § 1; 2003, ch. 88, § 2; 2004, ch. 130, § 1; 2017 ch. 45, § 1, § 2, effective February 17, 2017.

The 2004 amendment,

in (a), substituted “three (3) divisions” for “four (4) divisions,” in (a)(ii) inserted “and” at the end, and made related changes.

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 19, 2004.

The 2017 amendments. —

The first 2017 amendment, in (a), substituted “state military affairs and
those divisions that may be authorized by federal of state authority” for “and the following three (3) divisions,” and made a related change.

The second 2017 amendment, repealed former (a)(i), which read: “Army national guard”; repealed former (a)(ii), which read: “Air national guard; and”; and repealed former (a)(iii), which read: “State military affairs.”

Laws 2017, ch. 45, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
Art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved Feb. 17, 2017.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears on the printed act.

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 1998, ch. 99, § 6, provides: “Any other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 3, provides: “Any other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

§ 19-7-103.
Adjutant general; appointment; rank; removal; duties and qualifications.

The governor shall appoint a qualified adjutant general to be the commander of the Wyoming national guard and director of the Wyoming military department. He shall have the rank the governor designates and may be removed by the governor as provided in W.S.

9-1-202

. A prospective appointee shall possess the following qualifications:

Have served as a field, staff or line officer in the United States army or air force, or national guard, or both, for at least ten (10) years;

Have been a member of the Wyoming national guard for at least four (4) years immediately preceding his appointment;

Have attained at least the rank of lieutenant colonel and be federally recognized in that rank at the time of his appointment; and

Be a resident of the state of Wyoming.

The adjutant general of Wyoming shall have powers and duties and be paid a salary as follows:

He is in control of the military department of Wyoming and subordinate only to the governor in matters pertaining thereto. He acts as the governor’s designee with respect to personnel matters, including enlistments, promotions, demotions and discharges;

He shall issue and transmit all orders of the commander in chief and make returns and reports as the secretary of defense may direct;

He shall keep a record of all officers commissioned by the governor and maintain electronic access to all current orders, rules and regulations prescribed by the secretary of defense and the several agencies of the department of defense for the national guard;

He shall audit all claims and accounts against the military department not otherwise provided by law and shall have charge and carefully preserve the colors, flags and military trophies of war belonging to the state which shall not be loaned or removed from their prescribed place of deposit except by order of the adjutant general;

He shall ensure all organizations have access to the proper blanks, books and forms required and such military instruction books as may be prescribed;

He shall report to the governor on such matters as may be required by the governor as provided by W.S.

9-2-1014

and at such other times as the governor may require;

He shall make out reports and returns to the several agencies of the department of defense as may be required by law or regulations;

He may use the coat of arms of the state of Wyoming as his seal of office with the words: “State of Wyoming, Adjutant General’s Office”;

The annual compensation of the adjutant general shall be the base pay of a colonel, pay grade 0-6, the same as the armed forces of the United States, with longevity for appropriate years of military service, to be paid monthly out of the state treasury as the salaries of other state officers are paid;

He may purchase for cash or upon contract or otherwise acquire lands within Wyoming for use by the national guard or for the use of other elements of the armed forces as an artillery and target range and training and maneuvering area. He may acquire lands for such purposes by eminent domain when the state board of land commissioners gives its written approval or consent;

He may accept gifts of land for the purposes provided by paragraph (x) of this subsection and may lease, or accept payment in kind as consideration for any lease, any of the acquired parcels of land or buildings during periods when the lands are not in use for military purposes. He may acquire and install on the land such permanent improvements, including fences, as may be necessary for the full utilization of the land for the military purposes herein declared;

He may dispose of lands, buildings or fixtures under the control of the department by sale, exchange or other transfer. He may execute deeds for such transfers in the name of the state. Money from such sale, exchange or transfer may be utilized for the acquisition of additional lands, buildings or fixtures within the same budget biennium. Any such sale, exchange or other transfer shall be conducted in accordance with the provisions of W.S.

36-9-101

,

36-9-102

and

36-9-104

through

36-9-120

, except these provisions of W.S. title 36, chapter 9 shall not apply when both the title to the land and to all buildings thereon is solely in the name of the department or any division of the department and the provisions of W.S. 9-2-3204(b)(viii) also shall not apply when both the title to the land and to all buildings thereon is solely in the name of the department or any division of the department. The sections of title 36 identified in this paragraph and W.S. 9-2-3204(b)(viii) also shall not apply when any such sale, exchange or other transfer is to another governmental entity, state agency or local government, as defined in W.S.

1-39-103

, even if the title to the land and to all buildings thereon are not solely in the name of the department or a division thereof;

Repealed by Laws 2017, ch. 47, § 2.

Except as federal law requires, he shall secure a complete and accurate military service record of past and present Wyoming national guard personnel and those veterans who declare Wyoming as their residence upon separation from the military. He may accept the assistance and cooperation of all other governmental agencies and individual citizens to secure such records. He shall carefully keep and preserve such records physically or electronically in accordance with the laws and practices applied to the preservation and safekeeping of official records. All such records are confidential in accordance with the usual procedures and customs prevailing in the military service;

He is the channel of military and military department related correspondence with the governor and shall have custody of all military records, correspondence and other military documents until he has legal authority to properly dispose of or preserve physically or electronically such documents;

He shall control all armories that are owned, erected, purchased, leased or provided by the state. He may acquire, in the name of the state of Wyoming, by purchase, donation or dedication any property which may be used for military purposes. For the control and management of armories described in this paragraph, he may establish armory boards whose personnel shall serve without pay. Subject to his direction, armory boards shall control, manage and supervise all activities in armories and may rent armories to persons or organizations not connected with the organized militia;

He shall ensure commanders of national guard units have access to the blank forms, rolls, bonds and other returns they are required to make. He shall explain the principles upon which returns shall be made, and may make such general regulation concerning the same as will best promote uniformity in their rendition;

He shall keep physically or electronically the papers, volumes and records of the department in an office provided by the state;

He shall perform such other military duties as ordered by the governor;

He shall administer the Wyoming national guard educational assistance plan in accordance with W.S.

19-9-501

through

19-9-504

;

He may use federal procurement procedures when letting contracts concerning properties under the control of the adjutant general, subject to authorization as provided in W.S. 9-2-3204(b)(iv)(H);

If the authority is specifically granted by the legislature in its biennial budget, he may hire a person to occupy a new or existing position of state employment within the military department when federal funds are received which reimburse the state of Wyoming for one hundred percent (100%) of the cost of the position. In the event that federal funding becomes unavailable to maintain one hundred percent (100%) reimbursement for a position filled pursuant to this paragraph, as determined by the United States property and fiscal officer for Wyoming, he shall eliminate the position. He shall report to the legislature through the general government appropriations process all positions that are created or eliminated pursuant to this paragraph;

He may delegate part or all of his responsibilities under paragraphs (iii) and (xiv) of this subsection to the veterans’ commission;

On behalf of the military department he may accept gifts, grants, funds, assistance or other contributions from any federal, state or local governmental entity or from any private source in accordance with W.S.

19-7-208

;

He shall enter into agreements, exchange information and otherwise assist the department of workforce services to counsel, mediate, investigate and determine claims by members of the Wyoming national guard and employees of the military department under the federal laws enforced by the equal employment opportunity commission or under W.S.

27-9-105

, as applicable. He shall promulgate rules that coordinate with the department of workforce services rules promulgated under W.S. 27-9-104(a)(viii) to accomplish the powers and duties in this paragraph and W.S. 27-9-104(a)(viii), consistent with equal employment opportunity commission rules and requirements and federal law. Nothing in this paragraph prevents a state employee of the military department claiming to be aggrieved by an employment practice specified as discriminatory or unfair in W.S.

27-9-105

from filing with the department of workforce services a complaint in accordance with W.S.

27-9-106

.

Not later than October 31 of each year, the adjutant general shall report to the governor and the joint transportation, highways and military affairs interim committee on sexual harassment, discrimination and sexual assault matters within the military department. The report shall include at a minimum the following information for the fiscal year preceding the report, presented in a manner to avoid identification of individual persons:

Military department demographics including the number of state and federal employees, civilian and military employees, full and part-time air national guard members, full and part-time army national guard members and the gender of those members and employees;

Factual information on all incidents, reports and formal and informal complaints of sexual harassment, discrimination and sexual assault including:

Trends regarding position levels or status of reporting persons and persons named in reports and locations of incidents;

Incident dates, details and actions taken as allowed under privacy laws;

Inspector general and congressional complaints known to the adjutant general.

Changes in options for employees and members to report incidents of sexual harassment, discrimination or sexual assault;

Results and comparative results from previous years’ external assessments, internal assessments, unit climate surveys or group interviews such as unit sensing sessions;

Assessments, analysis and policies and procedures implemented in response to incidents of sexual harassment, discrimination or sexual assault;

Required annual trainings, corrective action plans and recommendations for legislative or other actions.

History.

Laws 1925, ch. 163, §§ 1, 17, 18, 38; R.S. 1931, §§ 73-101, 73-117, 73-118, 73-139; Laws 1939, ch. 28, § 1; C.S. 1945, §§ 30-101, 30-118, 30-119, 30-142; Laws 1947, ch. 100, § 1; 1949, ch. 65, § 16; 1951, ch. 44, § 12; 1953, ch. 139, § 12; ch. 157, §§ 1, 2; 1955, ch. 171, §§ 1 to 3; 1957, ch. 157, § 19; W.S. 1957, §§ 19-28, 19-49 to 19-55, 19-78.8, 19-78.9; Laws 1961, ch. 148, § 30; 1965, ch. 115, § 31; 1967, ch. 181, § 26; 1969, ch. 72, §§ 8, 9; 1971, ch. 27, § 17; 1973, ch. 215, § 1; 1977, ch. 138, § 1; 1987, ch. 175, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

19-2-203

; Laws 1998, ch. 99, § 3; 1999, ch. 138, § 1; 2001, ch. 76, § 1; ch. 114, § 2; 2005, ch. 34, § 1; 2007, ch. 64, § 1; 2010, ch. 69, § 301; 2011, ch. 95, § 1; ch. 157, § 1; 2017 ch. 45, § 1, effective February 17, 2017; 2017 ch. 47, §§
1, 2, effective July 1, 2017; 2019 ch. 56, § 1, effective July 1, 2019; 2020 ch. 12, § 2, effective March 5, 2020; 2021 ch. 56, § 3, effective April 1, 2021; 2022 ch. 13, § 1, effective July 1, 2022; 2022 ch. 86, § 2, effective July 1, 2022.

Cross references. —

For authority of adjutant general to issue warrants, subpoenas, etc., in connection with courts-martial, see §

19-12-106

.

For power of adjutant general to provide group insurance plans for employees of military department, see §

19-7-202

.

For duties in connection with Wyoming state guard, see §

19-10-101

.

For provision that only qualified electors may be appointed to military offices, see art. 6, § 15, Wyo. Const.

As to power of eminent domain, see §§

1-26-501

through

1-26-817

.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, in (b)(xii), substituted “lands, buildings or fixtures” for “lands or buildings,” and inserted “buildings or fixtures” after “additional lands.”

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, added (b)(xxi).

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, in (b)(x), substituted “board of land commissioners” for “land board.”

The 2011 amendments. —

The first 2011 amendment, by ch. 95 § 1, effective July 1, 2011, added the present last sentence in (b)(xii).

The second 2011 amendment, by ch. 157 § 1, effective July 1, 2011, added (b)(xxii).

While neither amendment gave effect to the other, both have been given effect in this section as set out above.

The 2017 amendments. —

The first
2017 amendment, by ch. 45, § 1, in (a), substituted “the commander of the Wyoming national guard and director of the Wyoming military department” for “chief of staff.”

Laws 2017, ch. 45, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
Art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved Feb. 17, 2017.

The second
2017 amendment, by ch. 47, § 1, effective July 1, 2017, in (b)(iii), substituted “and maintain electronic access to all orders” for “and all orders”; in (b)(xiv), rewrote the first sentence, which read: “may secure and accept the assistance and cooperation of all other governmental agencies and individual citizens in securing a complete and accurate military service record of Wyoming service personnel”; in (b)(xv), inserted “and military department related”, and inserted “until he has legal authority to properly dispose of or preserve physically or electronically such documents”; and added (b)(xxiii).

The third
2017 amendment, by ch. 47, § 2, effective July 1, 2017, repealed former (b)(xiii).

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, in (b)(v), substituted “He shall ensure all organizations have access to the proper blanks” for “He shall furnish all organizations with the proper blanks”; in (b)(xvii), substituted “He shall ensure commanders of national guard units have access to the blank forms, rolls, bonds and other returns they are required to make” for “He shall furnish to commanders of national guard units, blank forms, rolls, bonds and other returns required to be made by them”; and in (b)(xviii), substituted “He shall keep physically or electronically the papers” for “He shall keep the papers.”

The 2020 amendment,

added (b)(xxiv).

Laws 2020, ch. 12, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 5, 2020.

The 2021 amendment

substituted “9-2-3204(b)(viii)” for “9-2-1016(b)(viii)” in the third and fourth sentences of (b)(xii); and substituted “9-2-3204(b)(iv)(H)” for “9-2-1016(b)(iv)(H)” in (b)(xxi).

Laws 2021, ch. 56, § 7, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved April 1, 2021.

The 2022 amendments. —

The first 2022 amendment, by ch. 13, § 1, effective July 1, 2022, added (c).

The second 2022 amendment, by ch. 86, § 2, effective July 1, 2022, added (b)(xxv).

Removal of adjutant general under former § 19-28. —

See State ex rel. Pearson v. Hansen, 409 P.2d 769,

1966 Wyo. LEXIS 126

(Wyo. 1966).

Cited

in

Nelson v. Geringer, 295 F.3d 1082, 2002 U.S. App. LEXIS 13267 (10th Cir. 2002).

§ 19-7-104.
Assistant adjutants general; general officers; deputy military administrator and fiscal officer.

The adjutant general shall appoint such assistant adjutants general and other general officers as may be authorized by the army national guard and the air national guard. Each assistant adjutant general and general officer shall serve in their respective duty positions at the pleasure of the adjutant general and may be removed from the position by the adjutant general as provided under W.S. 9-1-202(b)(i). Each assistant adjutant general and general officer shall hold the rank of brigadier general and shall possess the qualifications set forth in W.S. 19-7-103(a)(i) through (iii). No person shall continue to serve as an assistant adjutant general or general officer after failing to qualify before a federal recognition board for promotion to the grade of brigadier general.

The adjutant general shall appoint a deputy military administrator for state military affairs, who shall serve in this position at the pleasure of the adjutant general and may be removed from this at-will position by the adjutant general under W.S. 9-1-202(b)(i). Under the direction of the adjutant general, the deputy military administrator shall prepare such reports, returns and requisitions as may be required and is accountable and responsible for all state military property and stores not in the possession of organizations. He shall receive and issue to all organizations on approved requisitions such property and equipment as may be required and authorized by appropriate state officials for the organizations. The annual compensation of the deputy military administrator shall be determined and fixed by the Wyoming personnel division. The duties of the deputy military administrator may be delegated to any officers of the Wyoming military department upon recommendation of the deputy military administrator and approval by the adjutant general.

Repealed by Laws 2003, ch. 88, § 2.

History.

Laws 1969, ch. 72, §§ 10, 11; 1971, ch. 27, § 3; 1977, ch. 138, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

19-2-204

; Laws 1998, ch. 99, § 3; 1999, ch. 138, § 1; 2003, ch. 19, § 1; ch. 88, § 2; 2017 ch. 45, § 1, effective February 17, 2017.

Residency requirement. —

State's newly enacted residency requirement for the position of assistant adjutant general (AAG) of the Wyoming national guard violates the Privileges and Immunities Clause, and consequently, removal of two officers from their positions as AAGs violated the United States Constitution; the proper remedy was reinstatement. Nelson v. Geringer, 295 F.3d 1082, 2002 U.S. App. LEXIS 13267 (10th Cir. Wyo. 2002).

The 2017 amendment, in (a), rewrote the first sentence, which read: “The adjutant general shall appoint an assistant adjutant general for the army national guard and an assistant adjutant general for the air national guard,” and inserted “and general officer” following “adjutant general” three times.

Laws 2017, ch. 45, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by Art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved Feb. 17, 2017.

§ 19-7-105.
Succession of office.

In the event of disability, death, absence or other condition which prevents execution of the duties of the adjutant general, and prior to an appointment of the governor to the contrary, the duties of the adjutant general shall be executed by the senior assistant adjutant general for either the army national guard or air national guard, by date of rank, as is then currently available. If none are available, then such duties shall be executed by the senior general officer for either the army national guard or air national guard, by date of rank, as is then currently available.

through (iii) Repealed by Laws 2017, ch. 45, § 2.

Repealed by Laws 2003, ch. 88, § 2.

History.

Laws 1998, ch. 99, § 1; 2003, ch. 88, § 2; 2017 ch. 45, § 1, § 2, effective February 17, 2017.

The 2017 amendments. —

The first 2017 amendment, in (a), substituted “senior assistant adjutant general for either the army national guard or air national guard, by date of rank, as is then currently available” for “following officers,” and added the last sentence.

The second 2017 amendment, repealed former (a)(i), which read: “The senior assistant adjutant general for either army or air guard affairs, by date of rank”; repealed former (a)(ii), which read: “he junior assistant adjutant general for either army or air guard affairs, by date of rank”; and repealed former (a)(iii), which read: “The deputy military administrator.”

Laws 2017, ch. 45, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
Art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved Feb. 17, 2017.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Cited

in

Nelson v. Geringer, 295 F.3d 1082, 2002 U.S. App. LEXIS 13267 (10th Cir. 2002).

§ 19-7-106.
Office of state judge advocate.

The adjutant general shall appoint a state judge advocate for the military department. The state judge advocate shall be an active member of the air or army national guard and shall serve as the legal counsel for the department. The state judge advocate may appoint such staff judge advocate officers as may be required and authorized by regulation.

The state judge advocate shall be a member in good standing in the Wyoming state bar. All other staff judge advocate officers shall be members in good standing in a state bar. Each staff judge advocate officer shall be qualified as a judge advocate pursuant to the regulations of the staff judge advocate officer’s respective United States army or air force component.

The state judge advocate and staff judge advocate officers who have been admitted to the Wyoming state bar and are in good standing with the bar may be appointed by the Wyoming attorney general as special assistant attorneys general for the purpose of representing the Wyoming military department before the courts of the state and nation. Appointment shall not constitute a conflict of interest in the officer’s nonmilitary practice of law as to any litigation in which another agency of the state is a party in interest. Judge advocate officers appointed special assistant attorneys general shall also be authorized to bring and prosecute, in the name of the state, criminal complaints against members of the Wyoming national guard relating to violations of the State Code of Military Justice, in any of the courts of this state.

History.

Laws 1998, ch. 99, § 1; 1999, ch. 138, § 1.

§ 19-7-107.
[Renumbered.]

Renumbered as

19-14-110

by Laws 2011, ch. 27, § 2.

Effective dates. —

Laws 2011, ch. 27, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 18, 2011.